District of Columbia statutes.
25-111

Wholesaler’s licenses.

(a)

A wholesaler’s license shall authorize the licensee to sell beverages from the establishment described to (1) another licensee under this title for resale; (2) a dealer licensed under the law of any state or territory of the United States for resale; and (3) in the case of beer or wine, to a consumer. The licensee shall sell beer to the consumer only in barrels, kegs, sealed bottles, and other closed containers, which shall not be opened after sale, or the contents consumed, on the premises where sold.

(b)

No licensee, except a wholesale druggist or a wholesale grocer, shall be engaged in a business on the premises for which the license is issued other than the sale of alcoholic and nonalcoholic beverages.

(c)

There shall be 2 classes of wholesalers licenses:

(1)

A wholesaler’s license, class A, shall authorize the licensee to sell spirits, wine, and beer.

(2)

A wholesaler’s license, class B, shall authorize the licensee to sell beer and wine.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law, 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-111.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.